Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 4 COORDINATED SYSTEM OF PAYMENT FOR EARLY INTERVENTION SERVICES FOR INFANTS AND TODDLERS
26.5-3-410. Annual report - cooperation from certified early intervention service brokers and qualified providers.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), by November 1, 2008, and by November 1 each year thereafter, the department shall submit an annual report to the general assembly regarding the various funding sources used for early intervention services, the number of eligible children served, the average cost of early intervention services, and any other information the department deems appropriate. The department shall submit the report to the joint budget committee as part of the department's annual budget request. The department shall also submit the report to the health and human services committees and the education committees of the senate and house of representatives, or any successor committees.

The department shall request, and certified early intervention service brokers and qualified early intervention service providers shall provide, information regarding early intervention services that the department needs to prepare the annual report required by this section or other required federal or state reports.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 627, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-710 as it existed prior to 2022.